California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(b) All assets and liabilities of the Transportation Investment Fund shall become assets and liabilities of the State Highway Account on or before June 30, 2016.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 12, Sec. 5.   (AB 95)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

7105.

(a) The Transportation Deferred Investment Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. The Transportation Deferred Investment Fund is to be considered part of the Transportation Investment Fund, except as specifically required for accounting purposes, in order to facilitate the repayment and allocation of revenues consistent with paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 1 of Article XIXB of the California Constitution as provided in this section and Section 7106.

(b) Pursuant to Section 14557 of the Government Code, the transfer of revenues from the General Fund to the Transportation Investment Fund that would have otherwise been required under subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIXB of the California Constitution was partially suspended for the 2003–04 fiscal year. The amount of the transfer for the 2003–04 fiscal year was two hundred eighty-nine million dollars ($289,000,000). According to the State Board of Equalization calculations, with the concurrence of the Department of Finance, the amount of the transfer suspended for the 2003–04 fiscal year was eight hundred sixty-seven million five hundred sixty-eight thousand dollars ($867,568,000). On or before June 30 of each fiscal year until June 30, 2016, the Controller shall transfer an amount from the General Fund to the
 Transportation Deferred Investment Fund that is equal to the minimum repayment required by Article XIXB of the California Constitution. The repayment shall also include interest calculated at the Pooled Money Investment Account rate relative to the amounts that would otherwise have been available for the transportation programs described in paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (c) of Section 7104. The amount to be repaid by June 30, 2016, from the General Fund to the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund shall be reduced by the amount of any payment made to the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund from any funding source, excluding subdivision (d). The moneys deposited in the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund pursuant to this subdivision are continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years for disbursement in the manner and for the purposes set forth in this section.

(c) The Controller,
 from the moneys deposited in the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund pursuant to subdivision (b) and Article XIXB of the California Constitution, shall make transfers and apportionments of those funds in the same manner and amounts that would have been made in the 2003–04 fiscal year from the Transportation Investment Fund pursuant to Section 7104, as that section read on January 1, 2003, if the transfer of funds from the General Fund to the Transportation Investment Fund had not been partially suspended for the 2003–04 fiscal year pursuant to Section 14557 of the Government Code, except that in the 2007–08 fiscal year any remaining principle or interest owed to the Public Transportation Account shall be repaid first before any other transfers are made. However, in making those transfers and apportionments, the Controller shall take into account and deduct therefrom any transfers and apportionments that were made from the Transportation Investment Fund in the 2003–04 fiscal year
 from funds made available pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14557 of the Government Code. It is the intent of the Legislature that, upon completion of the transfer of funds pursuant to subdivision (b) from the General Fund to the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund, each of the transportation programs that was to have been funded during the 2003–04 fiscal year from the Transportation Investment Fund pursuant to Section 7104 of this code shall have received the amount of funding that the program would have received in the absence of the suspension of the transfer pursuant to Section 14557 of the Government Code.

(d) The interest that is to be deposited in the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be allocated proportionately to each program element in paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (c) of Section 7104, based on the amount that each program did not receive in the 2003–04 fiscal year
 due to suspension of the transfer pursuant to Section 14557 of the Government Code.

(e) Four hundred ninety-five million dollars ($495,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund for the purpose of paying a portion of the amount required to be paid pursuant to subdivision (b). The Controller shall make the payment immediately upon enactment of the statute amending this section in the 2005–06 Regular Session. Notwithstanding subdivision (c), these funds, shall be distributed as follows:

(1) The first one hundred ninety-two million dollars ($192,000,000) and any interest due pursuant to this section shall remain in the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund to be used for projects in the State Transportation Improvement Program pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 7104.

(2) The next one hundred ninety-two million dollars ($192,000,000) and any interest due pursuant to this section shall be distributed to cities and counties, as follows:

(A) Ninety-six million dollars ($96,000,000) and any interest due pursuant to this section shall be transferred to cities for the purposes specified in Section 7104 pursuant to the formula in paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of that section.

(B) Ninety-six million dollars ($96,000,000) and any interest due pursuant to this section shall be transferred to counties for the purposes specified in Section 7104 pursuant to the formula in paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of that section.

(3) Ninety-six million dollars ($96,000,000) and any interest due pursuant to this section shall be
 transferred to the Public Transportation Account for allocation pursuant to Section 99312 of the Public Utilities Code.

(4) Any funds remaining following the distributions required by paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) shall be transferred to the Traffic Congestion Relief Fund, and shall be deemed to be funds received by that fund in the 2003–04 fiscal year.

(f) The Legislature finds and declares that continued investment in transportation is essential for the California economy. That investment reduces traffic congestion, assists in economic development, improves the condition of local streets and roads, and provides high-quality public transportation.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon order of the Department of Finance, all or some of the state agencies collecting revenues
 for, or spending from, the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund shall adjust budgeting, accounting, and reporting systems and documents so that unliquidated encumbrances, payables, and other accruals are not reflected in the fund balance in the Governor’s Budget fund condition display or the fund balance in the financial statements submitted to the Controller for the budgetary-legal basis annual report.

(2) For the purposes of the Governor’s Budget, the balance of cash advanced from the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund to the Transportation Revolving Account, as jointly determined by the Department of Finance and the state agencies referenced in paragraph (1), shall be deemed as resources and cash available to the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund for budgeting purposes.

(3) This method shall be effective with the 2013–14 Governor’s Budget development process and
 may be applied to the 2011–12 data.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 35, Sec. 10.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7105.1.

(a) The State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund is the successor account to the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund.

(b) All assets and liabilities of the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund shall become assets and liabilities of the State Highway Account on or before January 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 32, Sec. 10.   (SB 87)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7106.

(a) Pursuant to Section 14558 of the Government Code, the transfer of revenues from the General Fund to the Transportation Investment Fund that would have otherwise been required under subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIXB of the California Constitution was suspended for the 2004–05 fiscal year. According to the State Board of Equalization calculations, with the concurrence of the Department of Finance, the amount of the transfer suspended for the 2004–05 fiscal year was one billion two hundred fifty-seven
 million nine hundred forty-six thousand dollars ($1,257,946,000). On or before June 30 of each fiscal year until June 30, 2016, the Controller shall transfer an amount from the General Fund to the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund that is equal to the minimum repayment required by Article XIXB of the California Constitution. The repayment shall also include interest calculated at the Pooled Money Investment Account rate relative to the amounts that would otherwise have been available for the transportation programs described in paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (c) of Section 7104. The amount to be repaid by June 30, 2016, from the General Fund to the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund shall be reduced by the amount of any payment made to the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund from any funding source.

(b) The money deposited in the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund pursuant to this
 section is continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years for disbursement in the manner and for the purposes set forth in this section.

(c) The Controller, from the money deposited in the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) and Article XIXB of the California Constitution, shall make transfers and apportionments of those funds in the same manner and amounts that would have been made in the 2004–05 fiscal year from the Transportation Investment Fund pursuant to Section 7104, as that section read on January 1, 2003, if the transfer of funds from the General Fund to the Transportation Investment Fund had not been suspended for the 2004–05 fiscal year pursuant to Section 14558 of the Government Code. It is the intent of the Legislature that upon completion of the transfer of funds pursuant to subdivision (a) from the General Fund to the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund that
 each of the transportation programs that was to have been funded during the 2004–05 fiscal year from the Transportation Investment Fund pursuant to Section 7104 shall have received the amount of funding that the program would have received in the absence of the suspension of the transfer pursuant to Section 14558 of the Government Code.

(d) The interest that is to be deposited in the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be allocated proportionately to each program element in paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (c) of Section 7104, based on the amount that each program did not receive in the 2004–05 fiscal year due to suspension of the transfer pursuant to Section 14558 of the Government Code.

(e) Seven hundred twenty million dollars ($720,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Transportation Deferred
 Investment Fund for the purpose of paying a portion of the amount required to be paid pursuant to subdivision (a). The Controller shall make the payment immediately upon enactment of the statute amending this section in the 2005–06 Regular Session. In addition, two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) transferred to the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund pursuant to subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 7102 shall also be available for that purpose. Notwithstanding subdivision (c), these funds, totaling nine hundred twenty million dollars ($920,000,000), shall be distributed as follows:

(1) The first two hundred thirty-two million dollars ($232,000,000) and any interest due pursuant to this section shall remain in the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund to be used for projects in the State Transportation Improvement Program pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 7104.

(2) The next two hundred thirty-two million dollars ($232,000,000) and any interest due pursuant to this section shall be distributed to cities and counties, as follows:

(A) One hundred sixteen million dollars ($116,000,000) and any interest due pursuant to this section shall be transferred to cities for the purposes specified in Section 7104 pursuant to the formula in paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of that section.

(B) One hundred sixteen million dollars ($116,000,000) and any interest due pursuant to this section shall be transferred to counties for the purposes specified in Section 7104 pursuant to the formula in paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of that section.

(3) One hundred sixteen million dollars ($116,000,000) and any interest due pursuant to
 this section shall be transferred to the Public Transportation Account for allocation pursuant to Section 99312 of the Public Utilities Code.

(4) Any funds remaining following the distributions required by paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) shall be transferred to the Traffic Congestion Relief Fund, and shall be deemed to be funds received by that fund in the 2004–05 fiscal year. It is estimated that the amount to be available under this subparagraph will be three hundred fifteen million dollars ($315,000,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 173, Sec. 7.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7107.

Pursuant to the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIX B of the California Constitution, moneys in the Transportation Investment Fund derived from the 2005-06, 2006-07, and 2007-08 fiscal year transfers from the General Fund made pursuant to subdivision (a) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIX B of the California Constitution are hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years for disbursement in the manner and for the purposes set forth in Section 7104 as that section read on March
 6, 2002.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 76, Sec. 6.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Violations [7152. - 7157.]

7152.

(a) Any person required to make, render, sign, or verify any report who makes any false or fraudulent return, with intent to defeat or evade the determination of an amount due required by law to be made is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 7153.

(b) Any person who willfully aids or assists in, or procures, counsels, or advises in, the preparation or presentation, in connection with any matter arising under this part, of a return, affidavit, claim, or
 other document that is fraudulent or false as to any material matter, whether or not the falsity or fraud is with the knowledge or consent of the person authorized or required to present the return, affidavit, claim, or document, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 7153.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 903, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7153.

Any violation of this part by any person, except as otherwise provided, is a misdemeanor. Each offense shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisonment not exceeding one year in the county jail, or both the fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1490, Sec. 15.   Effective September 27, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

7153.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, any person who violates this part with intent to defeat or evade the reporting, assessment, or payment of a tax or an amount due required by law to be made is guilty of a felony when the amount of unreported tax liability aggregates twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more in any 12-consecutive-month period. Each offense shall be punished by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or imprisonment for 16 months, two years, or three years,
 or both the fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 903, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7153.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, any person who purchases, installs, or uses in this state any automated sales suppression device or zapper or phantom-ware with the intent to defeat or evade the determination of an amount due pursuant to this part is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) (1) Any person who, for commercial gain, sells, purchases, installs, transfers,
 or possesses in this state any automated sales suppression device or zapper or phantom-ware with the knowledge that the sole purpose of the device is to defeat or evade the determination of an amount due pursuant to this part is guilty of an offense punishable by a fine as specified in paragraph (2), by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or, pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, for 16 months, or two or three years, or by both that fine and imprisonment. In addition, any person who uses an automated sales suppression device or zapper or phantom-ware shall be liable for all taxes, interest, and penalties due as a result of the use of that device. 

(2) (A) Where a person is guilty of the offense described in paragraph (1) and the person sold, installed, transferred, or possessed three or fewer automated sales suppression devices or zappers or phantom-ware, that person shall be
 guilty of an offense punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(B) Where a person is guilty of the offense described in paragraph (1) and the person sold, installed, transferred, or possessed more than three automated sales suppression devices or zappers or phantom-ware, that person shall be guilty of an offense punishable by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(3) This subdivision shall not apply to a person that is a corporation that possesses any automated sales suppression device or zapper or phantom-ware for the sole purpose of developing hardware or software to combat the evasion of taxes by use of automated sales suppression devices or zappers or phantom-ware.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Automated sales suppression device” or “zapper” means a software program carried on a memory stick or removable compact disc, accessed through an Internet link, or accessed through any other means, that falsifies the electronic records of electronic cash registers and other point-of-sale systems, including, but not limited to, transaction data and transaction reports.

(2) “Electronic cash register” means a device that keeps a register or supporting documents through the means of an electronic device or computer system designed to record transaction data for the purpose of computing, compiling, or processing retail sales transaction data in whatever manner.

(3) “Phantom-ware” means a hidden, preinstalled, or installed at a later time programming option embedded in the operating system of an electronic cash register or hardwired into the electronic cash register
 that can be used to create a virtual second till or may eliminate or manipulate transaction records that may or may not be preserved in digital formats to represent the true or manipulated record of transactions in the electronic cash register.

(4) “Transaction data” includes information regarding items purchased by a customer, the price for each item, a taxability determination for each item, a segregated tax amount for each of the taxed items, the amount of cash or credit tendered, the net amount returned to the customer in change, the date and time of the purchase, the name, address, and identification number of the vendor, and the receipt or invoice number of the transaction. 

(d) This section shall not preclude prosecution under any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 532, Sec. 1.   (AB 781)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7154.

Any prosecution for violation of any of the penal provisions of this part shall be instituted within five years after the commission of the offense, or within two years after the violation is discovered, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 902, Sec. 8.   Effective September 25, 1992.   Operative January 1, 1993, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 902.)
-------------------------------------------

7155.

(a) Any person who, for the purpose of evading the payment of taxes due under this part, knowingly fails to obtain a valid permit prior to the date on which the first tax return is due shall be liable for a penalty of 50 percent of any tax determined to be due for the period during which the person engaged in business in this state as a seller without a valid permit.

(b) This section shall not apply to any person whose measure of tax liability over the period during which he or she was engaged in business in this state as a seller without a
 valid permit averaged one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less per month.

(c) This section shall not apply to the amount of taxes due on the sale or use of a vehicle, vessel, or aircraft, if the amount is subject to the penalty imposed by Section 6485.1 or Section 6514.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1490, Sec. 16.   Effective September 27, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

7156.

(a) In the case of any civil proceeding which is—(1) Brought by or against the State of California in connection with the determination, collection, or refund of any tax, interest, or penalty under this part, and(2) Brought in a court of record of this state,the prevailing party may be awarded a judgment for reasonable litigation costs incurred in that
 proceeding.

(b) (1) A judgment for reasonable litigation costs shall not be awarded under subdivision (a) unless the court determines that the prevailing party has exhausted the administrative remedies available to that party under this part.

(2) An award under subdivision (a) shall be made only for reasonable litigation costs which are allocable to the State of California and not to any other party to the action or proceeding.

(3) No award for reasonable litigation costs may be made under subdivision (a) with respect to any declaratory judgment proceeding.

(4) No award for reasonable litigation costs may be made under subdivision (a) with respect to any portion of the civil proceeding during which the prevailing party has
 unreasonably protracted that proceeding.

(c) For purposes of this section—

(1) The term “reasonable litigation costs” includes any of the following: 

(A) Reasonable court costs.

(B) Based upon prevailing market rates for the kind or quality of services furnished any of the following:

(i) The reasonable expenses of expert witnesses in connection with the civil proceeding, except that no expert witness shall be compensated at a rate in excess of the highest rate of compensation for expert witnesses paid by the State of California.

(ii) The reasonable cost of any study, analysis, engineering report, test, or project which is
 found by the court to be necessary for the preparation of the party’s case.

(iii) Reasonable fees paid or incurred for the services of attorneys in connection with the civil proceeding, except that those fees shall not be in excess of seventy-five dollars ($75) per hour unless the court determines that an increase in the cost of living or a special factor, such as the limited availability of qualified attorneys for the proceeding, justifies a higher rate.

(2) (A) The term “prevailing party” means any party to any proceeding described in subdivision (a) (other than the State of California or any creditor of the taxpayer involved) which—

(i) Establishes that the position of the State of California in the civil proceeding was not substantially justified, and

(ii) (I) Has substantially prevailed with respect to the amount in controversy, or

(II) Has substantially prevailed with respect to the most significant issue or set of issues presented.

(B) Any determination under subparagraph (A) as to whether a party is a prevailing party shall be made—

(i) By the court, or

(ii) By agreement of the parties.

(3) The term “civil proceeding” includes a civil action.

(d) For purposes of this section, in the case of—(1) Multiple actions which could have been joined or consolidated, or(2) A case or cases involving a return or returns of the same taxpayer which could have been joined in a single proceeding in the same court,
these actions or cases shall be treated as one civil proceeding regardless of whether the joinder or consolidation actually occurs, unless the court in which the action is brought determines, in its discretion, that it would be inappropriate to treat these actions or cases as joined or consolidated for purposes of this section.

(e) An order granting or denying an award for reasonable litigation costs under subdivision (a), in whole or in part, shall be incorporated as a part of the decision or judgment in the case and shall be subject to appeal in the
 same manner as the decision or judgment.

(f) For purposes of this section, “position of the State of California” includes either of the following:

(1) The position taken by the State of California in the civil proceeding.

(2) Any administrative action or inaction by the State Board of Equalization (and all subsequent administrative action or inaction) upon which that proceeding is based.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1574, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7157.

(a) (1) Restitution orders or any other amounts imposed by a court of competent jurisdiction for criminal offenses upon a person or any other entity that are due and payable to the board may be collected by the board in any manner provided by law for collection of a delinquent sales and use tax liability, including, but not limited to, issuance of an order and levy under Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of
 Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure in the manner provided for earnings withholding orders for taxes.

(2) Amounts imposed by a court of competent jurisdiction as an order of restitution for criminal offenses shall be treated as final and due and payable to the State of California on the date that amount is established on the records of the board.

(b) Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001), Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), and Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 7285) shall apply to amounts collected under this section in the same manner and with the same force and effect and to the full extent as if the language of those laws had been incorporated in full into this section, except to the extent that any provision is either inconsistent with this section or is not relevant to this section.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6901), a refund or credit shall not be allowed for any amounts paid or payments applied under this section.

(d) Amounts authorized to be collected pursuant to this section may accrue interest at the greater of the rate applicable to the amounts being collected or the rate provided under Section 6591.5 from and after the date the amounts are established on the records of the board.

(e) Amounts authorized to be collected pursuant to this section shall not be subject to any statute of limitations set forth in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6701).

(f) Notwithstanding Section 6738 or Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, any portion of the amounts
 authorized to be collected under this section that remain unsatisfied may be collected by the recording of a notice of state tax lien. The board may record or extend a recorded notice of state tax lien at any time until the amount due, including any accrued interest, is paid in full.

(g) This section shall apply on and after January 1, 2012, to amounts authorized to be collected pursuant to this section that are due and payable to the board before, on, or after January 1, 2012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 727, Sec. 12.   (AB 242)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Res Judicata [7176. - 7176.]

7176.

In the determination of any case arising under this part the rule of res judicata is applicable only if the liability involved is for the same quarterly period as was involved in another case previously determined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 1.5. UNIFORM LOCAL SALES AND USE TAXES [7200. - 7226.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [7200. - 7213.]

7200.

This part is known and may be cited as the “Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1311.)
-------------------------------------------

7201.

Any county may by action of its board of supervisors adopt a sales and use tax in accordance with the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1311.)
-------------------------------------------

7202.

The sales tax portion of any sales and use tax ordinance adopted under this part shall be imposed for the privilege of selling tangible personal property at retail, and shall include provisions in substance as follows:

(a) A provision imposing a tax for the privilege of selling tangible personal property at retail upon every retailer in the county at the rate of 114
 percent of the gross receipts of the retailer from the sale of all tangible personal property sold by that person at retail in the county.

(b) Provisions identical to those contained in Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001), insofar as they relate to sales taxes, except that the name of the county as the taxing agency shall be substituted for that of the state and that an additional seller’s permit shall not be required if one has been or is issued to the seller under Section 6067.

(c) A provision that all amendments subsequent to the effective date of the enactment of Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) relating to sales tax and not inconsistent with this part, shall automatically become a part of the sales tax ordinance of the county.

(d) A provision that the county shall contract prior to the effective date of
 the county sales and use tax ordinances with the State Board of Equalization to perform all functions incident to the administration or operation of the sales and use tax ordinance of the county. Any such contract shall contain a provision that the county agrees to comply with the provisions of Article 11 (commencing with Section 29530) of Chapter 2 of Division 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(e) A provision that the ordinance may be made inoperative not less than 60 days, but not earlier than the first day of the calendar quarter, following the county’s lack of compliance with Article 11 (commencing with Section 29530) of Chapter 2 of Division 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code or following an increase by any city within the county of the rate of its sales or use tax above the rate in effect at the time the county ordinance was enacted.

(f) A provision that the amount
 subject to tax shall not include the amount of any sales tax or use tax imposed by the State of California upon a retailer or consumer.

(g) A provision that there is exempted from the sales tax 80 percent, and on and after July 1, 2004, until the rate modifications in subdivision (a) of Section 7203.1 cease to apply, 75 percent, of the gross receipts from the sale of tangible personal property, other than fuel or petroleum products, to operators of aircraft to be used or consumed principally outside the county in which the sale is made and directly and exclusively in the use of the aircraft as common carriers of persons or property under the authority of the laws of this state, the United States, or any foreign government.

(h) A provision that any person subject to a sales and use tax under the county ordinance shall be entitled to credit against the payment of taxes due under
 that ordinance the amount of sales and use tax due to any city in the county; provided that the city sales and use tax is levied under an ordinance including provisions in substance as follows:

(1) A provision imposing a tax for the privilege of selling tangible personal property at retail upon every retailer in the city at the rate of 1 percent or less of the gross receipts of the retailer from the sale of all tangible personal property sold by that person at retail in the city and a use tax of 1 percent or less of purchase price upon the storage, use or other consumption of tangible personal property purchased from a retailer for storage, use or consumption in the city.

(2) Provisions identical to those contained in Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001), insofar as they relate to sales and use taxes, except that the name of the city as the taxing agency shall be substituted for
 that of the state (but the name of the city shall not be substituted for the word “state” in the phrase “retailer engaged in business in this state” in Section 6203 nor in the definition of that phrase in Section 6203) and that an additional seller’s permit shall not be required if one has been or is issued to the seller under Section 6067.

(3) A provision that all amendments subsequent to the effective date of the enactment of Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) relating to sales and use tax and not inconsistent with this part, shall automatically become a part of the sales and use tax ordinance of the city.

(4) A provision that the city shall contract prior to the effective date of the city sales and use tax ordinance with the State Board of Equalization to perform all functions incident to the administration or operation of the sales and use tax ordinance of the city which
 shall continue in effect so long as the county within which the city is located has an operative sales and use tax ordinance enacted pursuant to this part.

(5) A provision that the storage, use or other consumption of tangible personal property, the gross receipts from the sale of which has been subject to sales tax under a sales and use tax ordinance enacted in accordance with this part by any city and county, county, or city in this state, shall be exempt from the tax due under this ordinance.

(6) A provision that the amount subject to tax shall not include the amount of any sales tax or use tax imposed by the State of California upon a retailer or consumer.

(7) A provision that there are exempted from the computation of the amount of the sales tax the gross receipts from the sale of tangible personal property to
 operators of aircraft to be used or consumed principally outside the city in which the sale is made and directly and exclusively in the use of the aircraft as common carriers of persons or property under the authority of the laws of this state, the United States, or any foreign government.

(8) A provision that, in addition to the exemptions provided in Sections 6366 and 6366.1, the storage, use, or other consumption of tangible personal property purchased by operators of aircraft and used or consumed by the operators directly and exclusively in the use of the aircraft as common carriers of persons or property for hire or compensation under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued pursuant to the laws of this state, the United States, or any foreign government is exempt from the use tax.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 4.16.   Effective December 12, 2003.   Operative March 3, 2004, pursuant to Sec. 8 of Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7202.1.

(a) For the purposes of a tax adopted under this part, any retail sale of a digital product transferred electronically or accessed remotely is subject to the sourcing rule established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6010.5.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 20.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7202.5.

In addition to the provisions set forth in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, of subdivision (h) of Section 7202, a city, county, or city and county sales and use tax ordinance may provide that any person subject to a sales and use tax under the city's, county's, or city and county’s ordinance shall be entitled to credit against the payment of taxes due under that ordinance the amount of sales and use taxes due to the redevelopment agency pursuant to Section 7202.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 905, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1992.   Operative January 1, 1993, by Sec. 8 of Ch. 905.)
-------------------------------------------

7202.8.

Any pledge of taxes pursuant to Section 33641 of the Health and Safety Code made with respect to taxes imposed under Section 7202.6 to the payment of principal and interest on bonds of a redevelopment agency shall constitute the obligation of a contract between the redevelopment agency and the holder of the bonds and shall be protected from impairment by the United States and California Constitutions. The provisions of Section 7202.6 which authorize the imposition of the taxes may not be repealed during the time that any of the bonds remain outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 951, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

7203.

The use tax portion of any sales and use tax ordinance adopted under this part shall impose a complementary tax upon the storage, use or other consumption in the county of tangible personal property purchased from any retailer for storage, use or other consumption in the county. That tax shall be at the rate of 114 percent of the sales price of the property whose storage, use or other consumption is subject to the tax and shall
 include:

(a) Provisions identical to the provisions contained in Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001), other than Section 6201 insofar as those provisions relate to the use tax, except that the name of the county as the taxing agency enacting the ordinance shall be substituted for that of the state (but the name of the county shall not be substituted for the word “state” in the phrase “retailer engaged in business in this state” in Section 6203 nor in the definition of that phrase in Section 6203).

(b) A provision that all amendments subsequent to the date of such ordinance to the provisions of the Revenue and Taxation Code relating to the use tax and not inconsistent with this part shall automatically become a part of the ordinance.

(c) A provision that the storage, use or other consumption of tangible personal